Louisiana, session 2026, HB396.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. Code of Evidence Article 416 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 Art. 416. Autopsy photographs
8 Photographs taken during an autopsy are admissible in any criminal
9 proceeding.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.